West Virginia, session 2026, HB4254.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Tax Department. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 31, 2025, authorized under the authority of §11-13FF-5 of this code, modified by the Tax Department to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on August 26, 2025, relating to the Tax Department (tax credit for providing vehicles to low-income workers, 110 CSR 13FF), is authorized.